Utah statutes.
53A-15-1212.   Dissemination of information on the Statewide Online Education Program.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall develop a website for the Statewide Online Education Program which shall include:

(a)  a description of the Statewide Online Education Program, including its purposes;

(b)  information on who is eligible to enroll, and how an eligible student may enroll, in an online course;

(c)  a directory of online course providers;

(d)  a link to a course catalog for each online course provider; and

(e)  a report on the performance of online course providers as required by Section 53A-15-1211.

(2)  An online course provider shall provide the following information on the online course provider's website:

(a)  a description of the Statewide Online Education Program, including its purposes;

(b)  information on who is eligible to enroll, and how an eligible student may enroll, in an online course;

(c)  a course catalog;

(d)  scores aggregated by test on statewide assessments administered under Chapter 1, Part 6, Achievement Tests, taken by students at the end of an online course offered through the Statewide Online Education Program;

(e)  the percentage of an online course provider's students who complete online courses within the applicable time period specified in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4)(c);

(f)  the percentage of an online course provider's students who complete online courses after the applicable time period specified in Subsection 53A-15-1206(4)(c) and before the student graduates from high school; and

(g)  the online learning provider's pupil-teacher ratio for the online courses combined.

